District of Columbia statutes.
8-1841.08

Violation and penalty.

Any person found guilty of violating this subchapter shall be subject to a penalty of $500 for the first offense and $1,000 for each subsequent offense.

Dec. 5, 2008, D.C. Law 17-281, § 408, 55 DCR 9186